District of Columbia statutes.
38-282.01

Child development facility requirements.

(a)

If 50% or more children in a licensed child development facility are eligible to participate in the CACF Program, the facility shall participate in the program unless OSSE grants it an exemption pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

To be eligible for an exemption, a child development facility must provide OSSE with a written statement describing why participation in the CACF Program constitutes a hardship. OSSE will determine whether good cause exists and provide notice to the child development facility that it is excused from participating in the CACF Program for one year from the date of the notice. To the extent possible, OSSE shall work with excused child development facilities to address barriers to participating in the CACF Program.

(c)

Subsection (b) of this section shall expire on September 30, 2016.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4073a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7030(a), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7016(f)(1) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 4077, an applicability clause, see § 7016(f)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).